California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) The stewardship assessment shall be approved by the department as part of a stewardship plan, and shall be sufficient to recover, but not exceed, the cost of the
 stewardship program. A stewardship plan shall require that any surplus funds be put back into the program to reduce the costs of the program, including the assessment amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 177.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

48705.

(a) On or before May 15 of each year, a manufacturer of a paint product sold in this state shall, individually or through a stewardship organization, submit a report to the department describing its paint product recovery efforts in a form and manner determined by the department. At a minimum, the report shall include all of the following:

(1) The total volume of architectural paint sold, excluding aerosol coating products, in this state during the preceding calendar year.

(2) The total volume of postconsumer architectural paint recovered, excluding aerosol coating products, in this state during the preceding calendar year.

(3) A
 description of methods used to collect, transport, and process postconsumer architectural paint in this state, excluding aerosol coating products.

(4) Commencing with the 2029 report, the total volume of the nonindustrial coatings, the coating-related products, and the aerosol coating products sold in this state during the preceding calendar year.

(5) Commencing with the 2029 report, the total volume of the nonindustrial coatings, the coating-related products, and the aerosol coating products recovered, including the amount, in this state during the preceding calendar year.

(6) Commencing with the 2029 report, a description of methods used to collect, transport, and process paint products in this state.

(7) The total cost of implementing the stewardship
 program.

(8) An evaluation of how the stewardship program’s funding mechanism operated.

(9) An independent financial audit funded from the stewardship assessment.

(10) Examples of educational materials that were provided to consumers the first year and any changes to those materials in subsequent years.

(11) Any other information deemed relevant by the stewardship organization for the department to determine compliance with the stewardship plan.

(b) The department shall review the annual report required pursuant to this section and within 120 days of receipt shall adopt a finding of compliance or noncompliance with this chapter. If the department determines that the annual report is
 noncompliant due to a failure to meet the requirements of this chapter, then the department may require the resubmittal of the annual report or take enforcement action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 23.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48705.1.

(a) A stewardship organization shall do both of the following:

(1) Upon the department’s request, provide the department with reasonable and timely access, as determined by the department, to its facilities relating to its operation of a paint product recovery program, as necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(2) Upon the department’s request, within 14 days, provide the department with relevant records necessary to determine its compliance with this chapter.

(b) All stewardship plans, annual reports, and other submissions to the department required by this chapter shall be maintained and kept
 accessible for three years. All stewardship plans, annual reports, and other submissions to the department required under this chapter shall include the following affirmation signed by an authorized representative of the stewardship organization: “Under penalty of perjury, I affirm that the information being provided to the department is true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 24.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48706.

(a) Within 24 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 48701.1, the department shall post on its internet website a list of manufacturers that are compliant with this chapter and that have a stewardship plan approved by the department pursuant to Section 48703. The department shall list, as appropriate, the reported brands of paint products for each manufacturer. The department shall update this list no less than once every six months.

(b) (1) A manufacturer or retailer shall not sell or offer for sale in this state a paint product to any person in this state unless the manufacturer of the paint product is in compliance with this chapter.

(2) The sales prohibition in paragraph (1) shall be effective on the 120th day after the notice described in subdivision (a) is posted on the department’s internet website, shall apply to any manufacturer that is not listed on the department’s internet website, and shall remain in effect until the manufacturer is listed on the department’s internet website or can demonstrate compliance as described in paragraph (3).

(3) A manufacturer that is not listed on the department’s internet website pursuant to this section but demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that it is in compliance with this chapter before the next notice is required to be posted pursuant to this section, may request a certification letter from the department stating that the manufacturer is in compliance. A manufacturer who receives that letter is in compliance with this chapter.

(4) If
 the department determines a manufacturer is not in compliance with this chapter, the department shall remove the manufacturer from the list of compliant manufacturers posted on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), a manufacturer may, for any inventory in stock before the initial list was posted by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), sell or distribute that inventory for sale in or into the state.

(d) A distributor or a retailer shall monitor the department’s internet website to determine if the sale of a manufacturer’s paint product is in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 26.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48706.1.

(a) A civil penalty may be administratively imposed by the department on any person who violates this chapter in an amount up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation per day. A person who intentionally, knowingly, or negligently violates this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty by the department of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation per day.

(b) In assessing or reviewing the amount of an administrative penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for a violation of this chapter, the department or the court shall consider all the following:

(1) The nature and extent of the violation.

(2) The
 number and severity of the violation or violations.

(3) The economic effect of the penalty on the violator.

(4) Whether the violator took good faith measures to comply with this chapter and the period over which these measures were taken.

(5) The willfulness of the violator’s misconduct.

(6) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated community.

(7) Any other factor that justice may require.

(c) The department shall establish, through regulations adopted pursuant to Section 48701.1, a process that shall include an informal hearing process by which the penalties
 will be assessed. The Administrative Adjudication Bill of Rights (Article 6 (commencing with Section 11425.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) applies to hearings conducted pursuant to this chapter and mandates minimum due process requirements for purposes of this chapter.

(d) The department shall deposit all penalties collected pursuant to this section into the Paint Product Stewardship Penalty Subaccount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 27.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48706.2.

(a) A manufacturer or stewardship organization shall not be liable for a violation of any antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practice, or other anticompetitive conduct arising from conduct undertaken in accordance with this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, actions undertaken in accordance with this chapter, including the conduct described in subdivision (a), does not violate either of the following acts:

(1) The Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(2) The Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 28.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48707.

The department, in coordination with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, may adopt regulations to clarify and implement this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 17.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. GARBAGE AND REFUSE DISPOSAL [49000. - 49620.]



  CHAPTER 1. Garbage Disposal Districts [49000. - 49050.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [49000. - 49000.]

49000.

“District,” as used in this chapter, means a district formed pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to any law which it supersedes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation [49005. - 49017.]

49005.

Any portion or portions of a county, whether contiguous or noncontiguous, and whether the portion or portions include incorporated or unincorporated territory, may be formed into a garbage disposal district in the manner and under the proceedings set forth in this chapter, except that less than the whole of any city shall not be included in the district without unanimous consent of the governing body of the city and no parcel of noncontiguous territory which is less than a full subdivision or which contains less than 10 privately owned acres may be included in any district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49006.

(a) The board of supervisors may determine, by resolution, that a portion of the county is in need of facilities for the disposal of garbage and should be formed into a district.

(b) Upon making the determination under subdivision (a), the board of supervisors shall fix a time and a place for a hearing on the matter of the formation of the district, which time shall be not less than three weeks after the adoption of the resolution, and shall direct the clerk of the board to publish a notice once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper which is circulated in the territory that is proposed to be organized into a district and which the board deems most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49007.

The notice shall state the fact that the board of supervisors has fixed the time and place, which shall be stated in the notice, for a hearing on the matter of the formation of a garbage disposal district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49008.

The notice shall describe the territory or shall specify the exterior boundaries of the territory proposed to be organized into a district. So far as practicable, the boundaries shall be the center lines of highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49009.

At any time prior to the time fixed for a hearing of the matter, any person interested may file with the clerk of the board written objections to the formation of the district.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing or at any time to which the hearing may be continued, the board of supervisors shall consider and pass on all objections to the creation of the district, or to the inclusion of any territory in the district.

At the hearing, the board of supervisors may exclude any territory that, in the opinion of the board of supervisors, would not be benefited by inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49010.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board of supervisors shall either adopt an order abandoning the creation of the proposed district or shall, by resolution, order the matter of the creation of the district, within the boundary lines determined upon at the hearing, to be submitted to the voters registered in the proposed district at an election to be called for that purpose.

At the election only voters registered in the proposed district shall be permitted to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49011.

Election precincts shall be established by the board of supervisors, and election boards composed of one inspector, one judge, and one clerk shall be named. At least one week prior to the election, notice of the election shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed district. In other matters, the election shall be conducted in the manner ordered by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49012.

(a) Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the board of supervisors shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. The written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the board of supervisors.

(b) The executive officer of the local agency formation commission, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the local agency formation commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation.

(c) The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed.

(d) The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49013.

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of those voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

(b) Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49014.

(a) If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, the election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

(b) In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(1) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(2) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of those voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49015.

(a) The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

(b) The ballot pamphlet shall contain all of the following in the order prescribed:

(1) The complete text of the proposition.

(2) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(3) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(4) The argument against the proposed district formation.

(c) The election officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 178.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

49016.

If at the election a majority of all those voting upon the question of creation of the district, and a majority of those voting thereon in each city is in favor of the formation of the district, the board of supervisors shall make an order forming the district and thereupon it is formed.

The order shall contain the name of the district and a description of the boundaries, or otherwise indicate its territorial extent.

The order is conclusive evidence of the regularity of all prior proceedings, except the adoption and publication in full of the resolution of intention, and of the fact of the holding of the hearing on formation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49017.

(a) A district may be formed for the exclusive purpose of providing, maintaining, and operating a garbage and refuse disposal site. In forming a district for this limited purpose, the determination of the board of supervisors required by Section 44006 shall be that this is the exclusive purpose of the district. In all other matters a district shall be formed in the same manner as other districts under this chapter. On formation, the district shall have only those powers granted to districts by this chapter that are reasonably necessary to carry out the exclusive purpose.

(b) A district formed for the exclusive purpose of providing, maintaining, and operating a garbage and refuse disposal site may issue bonds and levy taxes therefor in the same manner as provided for bonds of garbage and refuse disposal districts pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 44160) of Chapter 2, and may issue revenue bonds pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [49018. - 49020.]

49018.

The board of supervisors is the governing body of the district and may do any or all of the following:

(a) Make and enforce all rules and regulations necessary for the administration and government of the district, and for the collection and disposal of garbage and other refuse matter in the district.

(b) Appoint agents and employees for the district sufficient to maintain and operate the property acquired for the purposes of the district.

(c) Acquire in the name of the county, by gift, purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, and own, control, manage, and dispose of, any interest in real or personal property necessary or convenient for the collection and disposal of the garbage or other refuse matter of the district.

(d) Perform all of the acts necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49019.

(a) The board of supervisors may enter into contracts for the disposal of garbage and other refuse matter. Whenever the board enters into, or renews such a contract, it shall advertise for bids for the performance of the work in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The advertisement shall be published pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code. If there is no newspaper of general circulation published in the county, the notice shall be given by posting in three public places for at least two weeks.

(b) All bidders shall be granted an opportunity to ascertain the details of the nature of the work to be done under the contract. The contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. If no satisfactory bid is obtained, the board may reject all bids. If all bids are rejected, the board of supervisors may readvertise for bids or, without the necessity of readvertising, may enter into contracts for the disposal of garbage and other refuse for a term not to exceed six months on terms that are necessary or proper in the exercise of the district’s powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49020.

If an emergency occasioned by default of a contractor or other circumstances which would be detrimental to the public health, safety, or welfare of the inhabitants of the district, the board of supervisors may, without the necessity of advertising for bids, enter into contracts for the disposal of garbage and other refuse for a term not to exceed six months on terms that are necessary or proper, in the exercise of the districts’ power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Taxation [49030. - 49032.]

49030.

The board of supervisors shall levy a tax each year upon the taxable property in the district sufficient to defray the cost of the disposal of garbage and other refuse in the district, and of the maintenance of the district, and to meet other expenditures authorized by this chapter.

The tax shall be levied and collected at the same time, and in the same manner, as general county taxes levied for county purposes and, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury and used in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49031.

For any district in a county with a population of six million or more, the board of supervisors may prescribe and collect garbage and refuse collection and disposal service fees for the purpose of defraying the cost of the disposal of garbage and refuse in the district, maintaining the district, and meeting other expenditures authorized by this chapter.

Subject to the additional requirements of Section 49032, fees and charges prescribed, revised, and collected pursuant to this section shall be prescribed, revised, and collected pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5470) of Chapter 6 of Part 3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49032.

(a) Prior to adoption of the initial ordinances prescribing the fees provided for in Section 49031, the board of supervisors shall place before the voters of the district the question whether the district shall be authorized to prescribe fees. If the voters do not approve that authorization, a subsequent election to secure that approval shall not be held within one year of the date of the prior authorization election.

(b) The approval of the voters may be secured at a district or countywide election or by a ballot mailed to each registered voter of the district.

(c) The board of supervisors shall determine what majority of the voters voting on the proposition shall be required to approve the proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Claims [49040. - 49040.]

49040.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Annexation [49050. - 49050.]

49050.

The boundaries of any district may be altered, and outlying districts or territory, whether incorporated or unincorporated, and whether contiguous or noncontiguous, may be annexed pursuant to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code). However, no parcel of noncontiguous territory that contains less than 10 privately owned acres may be annexed to any district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Garbage and Refuse Disposal Districts [49100. - 49195.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [49100. - 49100.]

49100.

“District,” as used in this chapter, means a district formed pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to any law which it supersedes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation [49110. - 49118.]

49110.

Any contiguous portion or portions of a county, whether the portion or portions include incorporated or unincorporated territory, may be formed into a garbage and refuse disposal district in the manner and under the proceedings specified in this chapter. However, no city, or any portion thereof, shall be included in the district without the consent of the governing body of the city adopted by a favorable vote of two-thirds or more of its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49111.

(a) The board of supervisors may determine, by resolution, that a portion of the county is in need of a site for the disposal of garbage and refuse and should be formed into a district.

(b) Upon making the determination under subdivision (a), the board of supervisors shall fix a time and a place for a hearing on the matter of the formation of the district, which time shall be not less than three weeks after the adoption of the resolution. The board of supervisors shall also direct the clerk of the board to publish a notice once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper which is circulated in the territory that is proposed to organize into a district and which the board deems most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49112.

The notice shall state the fact that the board of supervisors has fixed the time and place, which shall be stated in the notice, for a hearing on the matter of the formation of a garbage and refuse disposal district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49113.

The notice shall describe the territory, or shall specify the exterior boundaries of the territory, proposed to be organized into a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49114.

At any time prior to the time fixed for a hearing on the matter, any person interested may file with the clerk of the board of supervisors written objections to the formation of the district. At the time and place fixed for the hearing or at any time to which the hearing may be continued, the board of supervisors shall consider and pass on all objections to the formation of the district or to the inclusion of any territory in the district. At the hearing, the board of supervisors may exclude any territory that, in the opinion of the board of supervisors, would not be benefited by inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49115.

At the final hearing the board of supervisors shall make those changes in the proposed boundaries that are advisable and shall define and establish the boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49116.

If, from the testimony given before the board of supervisors, it appears to the board of supervisors that the public necessity or welfare requires the formation of the district, it shall, by an order entered on its minutes, declare that to be its finding, and shall further declare and order that the territory within the boundaries so fixed and determined be organized as a district, under an appropriate name to be selected by the board of supervisors. The name shall be descriptive of the functions of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49117.

The county clerk shall immediately file for record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the land embraced in the district is situated, and also shall file with the Secretary of State, a certified copy of the order of the board of supervisors. From and after the date of the filing of the certified copy with the Secretary of State, the district named therein is organized as a district, with all the rights, privileges, and powers set forth in this chapter or necessarily incident thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49118.

No district shall be formed under this chapter after October 1, 1961.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Board of Directors [49120. - 49123.]

49120.

(a) Within 30 days after the filing with the Secretary of State of the certified copy of the order of formation, a governing board of trustees for the district shall be appointed.

(b) The governing board of a district is a board of directors of not less than three members. The district board shall be appointed as follows:

(1) If the district includes only one city, two members of the governing body shall be selected by the board of supervisors and one member of the governing body shall be selected by the city council.

(2) If the district includes two or more cities, only one member of the governing body of the district shall be selected by the board of supervisors to represent the unincorporated area. The legislative body of each city within the district shall appoint one member to represent each incorporated city within the district. If the selection of members pursuant to this subdivision results in the governing body having an even number of members, those members may appoint an additional member from the district at large.

(c) A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as an original appointment. The person appointed shall reside within the area he or she represents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

49121.

Any governing body authorized by Section 49120 to appoint a member to the district board may make the appointment from its own members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49122.

The members of the district board in office on September 15, 1961, shall, as soon as practicable thereafter, so classify themselves, by lot, that a majority of the members serve until January 1, 1963, and a minority of the members of the district board shall serve until January 1, 1965, or until the appointment of their successors or their resignation or termination of residence within the area they represent. Thereafter, the term of office of each succeeding member of the district board shall be four years and each shall hold office until the appointment of his or her successor or his or her resignation or termination of residence within the area he or she represents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49123.

(a) A member of a district board may be reimbursed, subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code, for actual and necessary expenses incurred by that member in the performance of official business of the district as approved by the district board.

(b) A district board
 may provide, by ordinance or resolution, compensation to a member of the board in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day of attendance at a meeting of the board or for each day of service rendered as director by request of the board. A member of a district board may receive compensation pursuant to this subdivision for no more than six days in a calendar month.

(c) For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a member of a district board’s activities on any specific day is compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government
 Code.

(d) In addition to any other compensation received pursuant to this section, the chairperson of a district board and the secretary of a district board, if the secretary is a member of the district board, shall each receive monthly compensation as established by the district board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties [49130. - 49131.]

49130.

The district board may do all of the following:

(a) Make and enforce all rules and regulations necessary for the administration and government of the district and for the operation and maintenance of the garbage and refuse disposal site acquired by the district.

(b) Appoint agents, employees, and experts for the district sufficient to maintain and operate the property acquired for the purposes of the district.

(c) Enter into contracts with other public agencies which may be necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes of the district.

(d) Acquire, in the name of the district, by gift, purchase, condemnation, or otherwise and own, control, manage, dispose of, and exchange, any interest in real or personal property.

(e) Perform all acts necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(f) Maintain and operate a garbage disposal site and facilities and fix and collect fees for the use thereof.

(g) Borrow money and incur indebtedness and guarantee the performance of its legal or contractual obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49131.

The district board may designate any depository for the custody of any or all the money collected or received for district purposes pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

A depository shall give security sufficient to secure the district against possible loss and shall pay the warrants drawn by the district for demands against the district under the rules that the district board prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Taxation [49140. - 49144.]

49140.

At least 15 days before the first day of the month in which the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated is required by law to levy the amount of taxes required for county purposes, the district board shall furnish the board of supervisors and county auditor of the county an estimate in writing of the amount of money necessary for district’s purposes during the next ensuing fiscal year.

The county tax collector shall collect the district taxes at the same time and in the same manner as the county taxes are collected. Unless the governing board has designated any depository pursuant to Section 49131, all money collected for district purposes shall be paid into the county treasury and paid out on warrants of the county auditor drawn on the county treasurer, upon order of the district board.

The amount of money necessary for the district’s purposes may include a cash-basis fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49141.

The district board may also include in its estimate prepared pursuant to Section 49140 an unappropriated reserve to cover expenditures that have not been provided for, or that have been insufficiently provided for, or for unforeseen requirements.

The money in any unappropriated reserve fund so established may be made available for appropriation by a four-fifths vote of the members of the district board at any regular or special meeting of which all members have had reasonable notice.

In addition, the district board may further provide, by resolution, for transfers or revisions of unencumbered funds within the general district expenditures provided for during any fiscal year where, in the opinion of the district board, the transfer or revision is necessary for purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49142.

The board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated shall, at the time of levying county taxes, levy a tax to be known as the “____ garbage and refuse disposal district tax,” sufficient to raise the amount reported to it by the district board, upon property of the district in the county.

The board of supervisors shall determine the rate of the tax by deducting 5 percent for anticipated delinquencies from the total assessed value of the taxable property of the district within the county as it appears on the assessment roll of the county, and then dividing the sum reported to it by the district board by the remainder of the total assessed value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49143.

For purposes of the district, the board of supervisors shall levy a tax of not more than fifteen cents ($0.15) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of taxable property of the district in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

49144.

The district board may establish and maintain a cash-basis fund for the purpose of defraying district expenses between the beginning of a fiscal year and the time of distribution of tax receipts in a fiscal year. The cash-basis fund shall not exceed 60 percent of the estimated expenditures for a fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Claims [49150. - 49150.]

49150.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Bonds [49160. - 49181.]

49160.
